Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DAKOTA COUNTY; INTERSTATE 35 INTERCHANGE PROJECT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,800,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Dakota County, the city of Lakeville, or both, to reconstruct County State-Aid Highway 50 from Kenrick Avenue to Klamath Trail as part of the Interstate 35 interchange project to address corridor mobility and safety improvements. The appropriation may be used for preliminary and final design and to engineer, acquire right-of-way and temporary and permanent easements, inspect, construct, and reconstruct County State-Aid Highway 50 and other roads, including 175th Street, and Kenrick Avenue, multipurpose pedestrian and bicycle facilities, public utility relocation, and stormwater management. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of proceeds of general obligation bonds. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,800,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end